fr: Type de capteur TPMS compatible: Non compatible avec le système TPMS; Nécessite une tige de valve TPMS spécifique; Compatible avec le système TPMS; Varie selon le type de capteur; Autre
vi: Loại cảm biến TPMS tương thích: Không tương thích TPMS; Yêu cầu chân van TPMS cụ thể; Tương thích TPMS; Thay đổi theo loại cảm biến; Khác
de: Kompatibler TPMS-Sensortyp: Nicht TPMS-kompatibel; Benötigt speziellen TPMS-Ventilschaft; TPMS-kompatibel; Variiert je nach Sensortyp; Sonstige
it: Tipo di sensore TPMS compatibile: Non compatibile con TPMS; Richiede stelo valvola TPMS specifico; Compatibile con TPMS; Varia in base al tipo di sensore; Altro
zh-TW: 相容的 TPMS 感測器類型: 不相容於 TPMS; 需要特定 TPMS 氣門嘴; 相容於 TPMS; 依感測器類型而異; 其他
pl: Kompatybilny typ czujnika TPMS: Niekompatybilne z TPMS; Wymaga specjalnego zaworu TPMS; Kompatybilne z TPMS; Zależy od typu czujnika; Inne
ja: 互換性のあるTPMSセンサータイプ: TPMS非対応; 専用TPMSバルブステムが必要; TPMS対応; センサータイプにより異なる; その他
hu: Kompatibilis TPMS érzékelő típusa: Nem TPMS kompatibilis; Specifikus TPMS szelepet igényel; TPMS kompatibilis; Érzékelőtípustól függően változik; Egyéb
fi: Yhteensopiva TPMS-anturityyppi: Ei TPMS-yhteensopiva; Vaatii tietynlaisen TPMS-venttiilivarren; TPMS-yhteensopiva; Vaihtelee anturityypin mukaan; Muu
sv: Kompatibel TPMS-sensortyp: Ej TPMS-kompatibel; Kräver specifik TPMS-ventil; TPMS-kompatibel; Varierar beroende på sensortyp; Övrigt
nb: Kompatibel TPMS-sensortype: Ikke TPMS-kompatibel; Krever spesifikk TPMS-ventil; TPMS-kompatibel; Varierer etter sensortype; Annet
ro-RO: Tip de senzor TPMS compatibil: Incompatibil cu TPMS; Necesită o valvă TPMS specifică; Compatibil cu TPMS; Variază în funcție de tipul de senzor; Altele
hr-HR: Kompatibilna vrsta TPMS senzora: Nije kompatibilno s TPMS-om; Zahtijeva specifičan ventil za TPMS; Kompatibilno s TPMS-om; Ovisi o vrsti senzora; Ostalo
sk-SK: Kompatibilný typ snímača TPMS: Nekompatibilné s TPMS; Vyžaduje špecifický driek ventilu TPMS; Kompatibilné s TPMS; Líši sa podľa typu snímača; Iné
lt-LT: Suderinamas TPMS jutiklio tipas: Nesuderinama su TPMS; Reikalingas specifinis TPMS ventilis; Suderinama su TPMS; Priklauso nuo jutiklio tipo; Kita
pt-PT: Tipo de sensor TPMS compatível: Não compatível com TPMS; Requer haste de válvula TPMS específica; Compatível com TPMS; Varia consoante o tipo de sensor; Outro
tr: Uyumlu TPMS sensör tipi: TPMS uyumlu değil; Özel TPMS supap gövdesi gerektirir; TPMS uyumlu; Sensör türüne göre değişir; Diğer
th: ประเภทเซ็นเซอร์ TPMS ที่ใช้งานร่วมกันได้: ไม่รองรับ TPMS; ต้องใช้ก้านวาล์ว TPMS เฉพาะ; รองรับ TPMS; แตกต่างกันไปตามประเภทเซนเซอร์; อื่นๆ
es: Tipo de sensor TPMS compatible: No compatible con TPMS; Requiere vástago de válvula TPMS específico; Compatible con TPMS; Varía según el tipo de sensor; Otro
bg-BG: Съвместим тип TPMS сензор: Несъвместим с TPMS; Изисква специфичен вентил за TPMS; Съвместим с TPMS; Варира според типа сензор; Друг
cs: Kompatibilní typ senzoru TPMS: Není kompatibilní s TPMS; Vyžaduje specifický ventilek TPMS; Kompatibilní s TPMS; Liší se podle typu senzoru; Jiné
pt-BR: Tipo de sensor TPMS compatível: Incompatível com TPMS; Requer haste de válvula TPMS específica; Compatível com TPMS; Varia de acordo com o tipo de sensor; Outro
ko: 호환 가능한 TPMS 센서 유형: TPMS 호환되지 않음; 특정 TPMS 밸브 스템 필요; TPMS 호환; 센서 유형별로 다름; 기타
zh-CN: 适配的胎压监测传感器类型: 不兼容 TPMS; 需要特定的 TPMS 气门嘴; 兼容 TPMS; 依传感器类型而异; 其他
sl-SI: Združljiva vrsta senzorja TPMS: Ni združljivo s TPMS; Zahteva poseben ventil TPMS; Združljivo s TPMS; Odvisno od vrste senzorja; Drugo
ru: Совместимый тип датчика TPMS: Несовместимо с TPMS; Требуется специальный вентиль TPMS; Совместимо с TPMS; Зависит от типа датчика; Другое
el: Συμβατός τύπος αισθητήρα TPMS: Μη συμβατό με TPMS; Απαιτεί συγκεκριμένο στέλεχος βαλβίδας TPMS; Συμβατό με TPMS; Ποικίλλει ανάλογα με τον τύπο αισθητήρα; Άλλο
nl: Compatibel TPMS-sensortype: Niet TPMS-compatibel; Vereist specifieke TPMS-ventielschacht; TPMS-compatibel; Varieert per sensortype; Overige
da: Kompatibel TPMS-sensortype: Ikke TPMS-kompatibel; Kræver specifik TPMS-ventil; TPMS-kompatibel; Varierer efter sensortype; Andet
en: Compatible TPMS sensor type: Not TPMS compatible; Requires specific TPMS valve stem; TPMS compatible; Varies by sensor type; Other